Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.005

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate disciplinary procedures for the licensed businesses and professions under the department of licensing by providing a uniform disciplinary act with standardized procedures for the regulation of businesses and professions and the enforcement of laws, the purpose of which is to assure the public of the adequacy of business and professional competence and conduct.

It is also the intent of the legislature that all businesses and professions newly credentialed by the state and regulated by the department of licensing come under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 256 s 10; 2002 c 86 s 101.]